New Jersey, session 221, A5202.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Electric public utility or utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that transmits and distributes electricity to end users within the State. Reconciliation charge means a positive dollar amount charged to utility customers by an electric public utility to help the utility recover the difference between estimated and actual costs to provide electricity service to utility customers, which costs are eligible for rate recovery and shall include, but not be limited to: basic generation service costs and associated administrative costs; fees; credits; taxes; and interest. b.    Notwithstanding any other law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, an electric public utility shall not impose a reconciliation charge on its customers. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.